Louisiana, session 2026, HB167.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 15:828.5 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§828.5. Post-release employment; relevant documentation
A. The Department of Public Safety and Corrections shall provide an inmate
who has been housed in a state correctional facility, has been released from a term
of imprisonment that resulted from the commission of a felony offense, and who has
designated his intended residence within this state with the relevant documentation
to assist with the obtaining of post-release employment.
B.(1) The department shall coordinate with the office of motor vehicles to
do both of the following:
(a) Identify whether an inmate has any form of a state identification card or
a driver's license and begin the process of gathering the documentation required for
the issuance of a special identification card pursuant to R.S. 40:1321 within nine
months prior to the release of the inmate.
(b) Provide a special identification card to any eligible inmate who does not
have a current state identification card or driver's license upon his release from
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 167 ENROLLED
custody. The special identification card shall be issued, replaced, canceled, and
denied in the same manner as a driver's license pursuant to Chapter 2 of Title 32 of
the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950.
(2) The office of motor vehicles shall do both of the following:
(a)(i) Permit an inmate to use a copy of his birth certificate along with his
master prison record issued by the department as a valid form of photo identification
in order to obtain a special identification card.
(ii) For the purposes of this Subsection, "master prison record" means a
detailed calculation, maintained by the department, of the prison sentence of an
inmate that determines his release date and includes credit for time served, good
behavior, and program participation.
(b) Determine and assess a reasonable fee for the issuance of a special
identification card.
(3) A special identification card issued with a master prison record to an
inmate is nonrenewable, nontransferable, and is valid for a period of six years from
the month of issuance.
(4) The department may utilize any available funds, including but not limited
to inmate trust funds, existing department funds, and donations to cover the costs
associated with the implementation and administration of this Section and the
purchase of special identification cards.
C. The provisions of this Section apply only to inmates who receive a special
identification card pursuant to R.S. 40:1321, who are in the physical custody and
control of the department, and who are housed in a state correctional facility.
D. For the purposes of assisting an inmate with obtaining post-release
employment, the department shall provide an inmate with all of the following:
(1) A copy of the educational and vocational training credentials or
certifications of the inmate earned during incarceration, if applicable.
(2) A copy of the work record of the inmate, if applicable.
(3) A copy of the birth certificate of the inmate, if obtainable.
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 167 ENROLLED
(4) A social security card or a replacement social security card of the inmate,
if obtainable.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.